Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202643-1519
Tribal customary adoption; adoptive home study.

(1) An Indian tribe participating in a tribal customary adoption may conduct the adoptive home study required by section 43-107, or designate another party to conduct such study in consultation with the tribe, so long as the study meets the nationally accepted standards for tribal licensing and approval.

(2) The state court shall accept such home study if the study uses the prevailing social and cultural standards of the Indian child's tribe as the standards to evaluate the proposed tribal customary adoptive placement.

Laws 2026, LB1032, § 24.
July 18, 2026